Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CAPITAL FOR EMERGENCY FOOD DISTRIBUTION FACILITIES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for grants to improve and expand infrastructure of food shelf facilities. Grant money must be made available to nonprofit organizations, federally recognized Tribes, and local units of government. new text end